Maryland, session 2026, SB0989.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
SUBTITLE 27. CIVIL ACTIONS FOR UNLAWFUL CHILD EXPLOITATION MATERIAL.
3–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CHILD PORNOGRAPHY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–208.1 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(C) “CHILD SEXUAL EXPLOITATION DEVICE OR IMAGE” MEANS AN
ANATOMICALLY ACCURATE MANNEQUIN, ROBOT, DOLL, DEVICE, OR IMAGE WITH
THE FEATURES OF OR FEATURES THAT RESEMBLE A MINOR INTENDED FOR USE IN
SEXUAL ACTS.
(D) “INTERNET” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–3701 OF THE
COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(E) “OBSCENE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–203 OF THE CRIMINAL
LAW ARTICLE.
(F) “ONLINE PLATFORM” MEANS ANY PUBLIC–FACING WEBSITE, WEB
APPLICATION, OR DIGITAL APPLICATION, INCLUDING A SOCIAL NETWORK OR AD
NETWORK.
(G) “UNLAWFUL CHILD EXPLOITATION MATERIAL” MEANS CHILD
PORNOGRAPHY, OBSCENE MATERIAL INVOLVING A MINOR, OR A CHILD SEXUAL
EXPLOITATION DEVICE OR IMAGE.
3–2702.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER OR ITS
AFFILIATES OR SUBSIDIARIES, A SEARCH ENGINE, OR A CLOUD SERVICE PROVIDER
TO THE EXTENT THAT THE ENTITY:
(1) IS SOLELY TRANSMITTING, ROUTING, STORING, OR PROVIDING
CONNECTIONS FOR THE ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATIONS INITIATED BY OR AT THE
DIRECTION OF ANOTHER PERSON; AND

SENATE BILL 989 3
(2) IS NOT RESPONSIBLE, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR THE CREATION
OR DEVELOPMENT OF UNLAWFUL CHILD EXPLOITATION MATERIAL.
3–2703.
(A) AN ONLINE PLATFORM MAY NOT KNOWINGLY AND INTENTIONALLY:
(1) ISSUE, SELL, DELIVER, DISTRIBUTE, TRANSFER, OR DISSEMINATE
UNLAWFUL CHILD EXPLOITATION MATERIAL; OR
(2) CREATE OR DEVELOP, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, UNLAWFUL CHILD
EXPLOITATION MATERIAL ON OR BY USING THE INTERNET.
(B) THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF A MINOR WHO IS DEPICTED IN OR
EXPOSED TO UNLAWFUL CHILD EXPLOITATION MATERIAL IN VIOLATION OF
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST THE ONLINE
PLATFORM THAT COMMITTED THE VIOLATION FOR:
(1) NOMINAL DAMAGES;
(2) ACTUAL DAMAGES;
(3) COURT COSTS;
(4) PUNITIVE DAMAGES; AND
(5) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND LITIGATION COSTS
INCLUDING EXPERT WITNESS FEES AND COURT REPORTER FEES.
(C) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY SEEK INJUNCTIVE RELIEF OR OTHER
EQUITABLE RELIEF TO ENFORCE THIS SECTION.
(D) THE REMEDIES AVAILABLE UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE AWARDED
WITHOUT REGARD TO WHETHER THE CONDUCT GIVING RISE TO THE VIOLATION
RESULTED IN A CRIMINAL CONVICTION.
3–2704.
(A) AN ONLINE PLATFORM FOUND TO BE IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE
SHALL BE HELD JOINTLY AND SEVERALLY LIABLE FOR THE VIOLATION.

SENATE BILL 989
(B) INDIVIDUAL CLAIMS BROUGHT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE THAT SATISFY
APPLICABLE STANDARDS FOR JOINDER OR CLASS ACTION MAY BE COMBINED IN A
SINGLE ACTION.
3–2705.
SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY IS NOT AN AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE TO A VIOLATION OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
3–2706.
A PERSON MAY BRING AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND RELIEF MAY BE
GRANTED WITHOUT SEEKING OR EXHAUSTING AVAILABLE ADMINISTRATIVE
REMEDIES.
3–2707.
THE REMEDIES PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE ARE CUMULATIVE AND MAY NOT
BE CONSTRUED AS RESTRICTING ANY OTHER REMEDY THAT IS AVAILABLE UNDER
LAW.
Article – Criminal Law
11–203.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “Obscene” means:
(i) that the average adult applying contemporary community
standards would find that the work, taken as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest;
(ii) that the work depicts sexual conduct specified in subsection (b)
of this section in a way that is patently offensive to prevailing standards in the adult
community as a whole with respect to what is suitable material; and
(iii) that the work, taken as a whole, lacks serious artistic,
educational, literary, political, or scientific value.
11–208.
(a) (1) In this section[, “indistinguishable] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE
THE MEANINGS INDICATED.

SENATE BILL 989 5
(2) “COMPUTER–GENERATED IMAGE” INCLUDES AN IMAGE CREATED
THROUGH THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SOFTWARE.
(3) (I) “INDISTINGUISHABLE from an actual and identifiable [child”]
MINOR” means an ordinary person would conclude that the image is of an actual and
identifiable minor.
[(2)] (II) “Indistinguishable from an actual and identifiable [child”]
MINOR” includes a computer–generated image that has been created, adapted, or modified
to appear as an actual and identifiable [child] MINOR.
[(3)] (III) “Indistinguishable from an actual and identifiable [child”]
MINOR” does not include images or items depicting minors that are:
[(i)] 1. drawings;
[(ii)] 2. cartoons;
[(iii)] 3. sculptures; or
[(iv)] 4. paintings.
(b) (1) A person may not knowingly possess and intentionally retain a film,
videotape, photograph, or other visual representation showing an actual [child] MINOR or
a computer–generated image that is indistinguishable from an actual and identifiable
[child under the age of 16 years] MINOR:
(i) engaged as a subject of sadomasochistic abuse;
(ii) engaged in sexual conduct; or
(iii) in a state of sexual excitement.
(2) A person may not knowingly or intentionally access and intentionally
view a film, videotape, photograph, or other visual representation showing an actual [child]
MINOR or a computer–generated image that is indistinguishable from an actual and
identifiable [child under the age of 16 years] MINOR:
(i) engaged as a subject of sadomasochistic abuse;
(ii) engaged in sexual conduct; or
(iii) in a state of sexual excitement.

SENATE BILL 989
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person who
violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment
not exceeding 5 years or a fine not exceeding $2,500 or both.
(2) A person who violates this section, having previously been convicted
under this section, is guilty of a felony and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not
exceeding 10 years or a fine not exceeding $10,000 or both.
(d) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a parent from possessing
visual representations of the parent’s own child in the nude unless the visual
representations show the child engaged:
(1) as a subject of sadomasochistic abuse; or
(2) in sexual conduct and in a state of sexual excitement.
(e) It is an affirmative defense to a charge of violating this section that the person
promptly and in good faith:
(1) took reasonable steps to destroy each visual representation; or
(2) reported the matter to a law enforcement agency.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.